Washington statutes.
RCW 43.105.265

Enterprise-based strategy for information technology—Use of ongoing enterprise architecture program.

(1) The agency shall develop an enterprise-based strategy for information technology in state government informed by portfolio management planning and information technology expenditure information collected from state agencies pursuant to RCW 43.88.092.

(2)(a) The agency shall develop an ongoing enterprise architecture program for translating business vision and strategy into effective enterprise change. This program will create, communicate, and improve the key principles and models that describe the enterprise's future state and enable its evolution, in keeping with the priorities of government and the information technology strategic plan.

(b) The enterprise architecture program will facilitate business process collaboration among agencies statewide; improving the reliability, interoperability, and sustainability of the business processes that state agencies use.

(c) In developing an enterprise-based strategy for the state, the agency is encouraged to consider the following strategies as possible opportunities for achieving greater efficiency:

(i) Developing evaluation criteria for deciding which common enterprise-wide business processes should become managed as enterprise services;

(ii) Developing a road map of priorities for creating enterprise services;

(iii) Developing decision criteria for determining implementation criteria for centralized or decentralized enterprise services;

(iv) Developing evaluation criteria for deciding which technology investments to continue, hold, or drop; and

(v) Performing such other duties as may be needed to promote effective enterprise change.

(d) The agency will establish performance measurement criteria for each of its initiatives; will measure the success of those initiatives; and will assess its quarterly results with the director to determine whether to continue, revise, or disband the initiative.

[ 2024 c 54 s 11; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 210; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 714. Formerly RCW 43.41A.065.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 ss 101-109, 201-224, 406-408, 410, 501-507, 601, and 602: See note following RCW 43.105.007.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.